Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2857.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 41, chapter 11, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 41-1610.04, to read: START_STATUTE41-1610.04. Inmate medical records; electronic storage; definition A. The department may store an inmate's medical records electronically. B. Notwithstanding any other law, if the department stores an inmate's medical records electronically, the department is not required to keep and may dispose of any physical copies of an inmate's medical records. C. For the purposes of this section, "medical records" includes any medical records that are retained by the department or a medical professional and that relate to medical treatment that was provided to the inmate while in a department facility. END_STATUTE APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR APRIL 7, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE APRIL 7, 2026.